ko: 샤워실 바닥 디자인: 모난; 사분면; 직사각형; 스퀘어; 기타
ru: Конструкция душевого поддона: Угловой; Квадрант; Прямоугольник; Квадрат; Другое
tr: Duş tabanı tasarımı: Açısal; Çeyrek; Dikdörtgen; Kare; Diğer
it: Design della base della doccia: Ad angolo; Quadrante; Rettangolare; Quadrato; Altro
pt-PT: Design de base de chuveiro: Ângulo; Quadrante; Retangular; Quadrado; Outro
nl: Ontwerp douchebak: Hoekig; Kwadrant; Rechthoekig; Vierkant; Andere
hu: Zuhanytálca kialakítása: Szögletes; Kvadráns; Téglalap; Négyzet; Egyéb
bg-BG: Дизайн на душ корито: Ъглово; Квадрант; Правоъгълно; Квадратно; Други
cs: Konstrukce základny sprchy: Hranatý; Čtyřúhelník; Obdélníkový; Čtvercová; Jiné
zh-CN: 淋浴室地面设计: 尖角; 象限; 矩形; 方形; 其他
sk-SK: Dizajn sprchového podstavca: Uhlový; Kvadrant; Obdĺžnikový; Hranatý; Iné
fi: Suihkualtaan muotoilu: Kulmikas; Kvadrantti; Suorakulmainen; Neliömäinen; Muu
lt-LT: Dušo pagrindo dizainas: Kampinis; Kvadrantas; Stačiakampis; Kvadratas; Kita
de: Design des Duschwannenunterbaus: Eckig; Quadrant; Rechteckig; Quadrat; Sonstiges
en: Shower base design: Angular; Quadrant; Rectangular; Square; Other
pt-BR: Formato da base de chuveiro: Angular; Quadrante; Retangular; Quadrado; Outro
hr-HR: Dizajn tuš-kade: Kutni; Kvadrant; Pravokutni; Kvadratni; Ostalo
ro-RO: Design cădiță de duș: Unghiulară; Semi-rotundă; Dreptunghiulară; Pătrată; Altele
pl: Konstrukcja podstawy prysznica: Kątowa; Kwadrant; Prostokątna; Kwadrat; Inne
es: Diseño de la base de la ducha: Angular; Cuadrante; Rectangular; Cuadrado; Otros
th: การออกแบบฐานฝักบัว: เชิงมุม; ควอแดรนท์; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
fr: Conception de la base de la douche: Angulaire; Quadrant; Rectangulaire; Carré; Autre
nb: Grunndesign for dusj: Kantet; Kvadrant; Rektangulær; Firkantet; Annet
vi: Thiết kế chân vòi hoa sen: Có góc cạnh; Tứ phần; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
sv: Utformning av duschkabin: Vinkel; Kvadrant; Rektangulär; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
ja: シャワールーム用床材の種類: 角ばった; 四分円; 長方形; スクエア; その他
da: Bruserbasedesign: Kantet; Kvadrant; Rektangulær; Firkant; Andet
zh-TW: 淋浴底座設計: 角形; 象限; 長方形; 方頭; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika tuš kadi: Kotna; Kvadratna; Pravokotno; Kvadraten; Drugo
el: Σχέδιο βάσης ντους: Γωνιώδης; Τεταρτοκύκλιο; Ορθογώνιο; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο